Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-118
Suppression of statement by defendant; order granting suppression; review; trial court; duties.

In making an order granting a motion to suppress a statement, the trial court shall in such order fix a time, not exceeding ten days, in which the county attorney or other prosecuting attorney may file a notice with the clerk of such court of his or her intention to seek a review of the order. Upon the filing of such notice, the trial court shall fix a time in which the application for review shall be filed with the clerk of the appellate court.

Laws 1981, LB 411, § 4;

Laws 1998, LB 218, § 12.